apertium-cak.cak.lexc
LEXICON PERS-TV-B ! Juego ergativo

! _ Cns: nu-, a-, ru-, qa-, i-, ki-
! _ Vow: w- , aw-, r-, q-,  iw-, k-

%<s_sg1%>:%{n%}%{u%}%> Tran ;
%<s_sg2%>:a%{w%}%> Tran ;
!%<s_sg3%>:r%{u%}%> Tran ;
%<s_sg3%>:%{r%}u%> Tran ;
%<s_pl1%>:q%{a%}%> Tran ;
%<s_pl2%>:i%{w%}%> Tran ;
%<s_pl3%>:k%{i%}%> Tran ;

LEXICON PERS-IV-A-3

%<s_sg3%>: Intr ; 

LEXICON PERS-TV-A-3

%<o_sg3%>: PERS-TV-B ; 

LEXICON PERS-TV-A-3-PASS

%<s_sg3%>: Tran ; 

LEXICON V-COMMON 

@D.Prefijo@%<inf%>:@D.Prefijo@%{≤%}%>%{o%}j                         # ; ! Prefix: -; Suffix: -{o}j;
@D.Prefijo@%<ger_ins%>:@D.Prefijo@%{≤%}%>bʼäl                       # ; ! Prefix: -; Suffix: -bʼäl;
@D.Prefijo@%<ger_ag1%>:@D.Prefijo@%{≤%}%>%{ö%}y                     # ; ! Prefix: -; Suffix: -{ö}y;
@D.Prefijo@%<ger_ag2%>:@D.Prefijo@%{≤%}%>nel                        # ; ! Prefix: -; Suffix: -nel; 
                                                                    V-TV-COMMON ; 
LEXICON V-TV-COMMON

! TODO: Does this only apply to passive / do we need to switch the agreement?
@R.Prefijo.1@%<cmpl%>:@R.Prefijo.1@%{≤%}%>%{V%}täj                  # ; ! Prefix: +; Suffix: -{V}täj
                                                                    # ; 
LEXICON TV 

@D.Pass.SinSujeto@%<v%>%<tv%>:@D.Pass.SinSujeto@                    # ; 
@D.Prefijo@%<v%>%<tv%>%<pp%>:@D.Prefijo@%>%{o%}m                    # ; ! Prefix: -; Suffix: -{o}m;  
@D.Prefijo@%<v%>%<tv%>%<subs%>:@D.Prefijo@%>ik                      # ; ! Prefix: -; Suffix: -ik;     ! FIXME: Possession
@R.Pass.SinSujeto@%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:@R.Pass.SinSujeto@%{≤%}            V-TV-COMMON ;
@R.Prefijo.1@%<v%>%<tv%>%<anti%>:@R.Prefijo.1@%{≤%}%>%{i%}n                         # ; ! Prefix: +; Suffix: -n      ! FIXME: xk'ayin // nito'on
@R.Prefijo.1@%<v%>%<tv%>%<anti%>%<agfoc%>:@R.Prefijo.1@%{≤%}%>o                # ; ! Prefix: +; Suffix: -o
%<v%>%<tv%>:                                                        V-COMMON ; 

LEXICON TV/Vj

@D.Prefijo@%<pp%>:@D.Prefijo@%>%{o%}m                    # ; ! Prefix: -; Suffix: -{o}m;  
@D.Prefijo@%<subs%>:@D.Prefijo@%>ik                      # ; ! Prefix: -; Suffix: -ik;     ! FIXME: Possession
@R.Prefijo.1@%<anti%>:@R.Prefijo.1@%{≤%}%>n                         # ; ! Prefix: +; Suffix: -n      ! FIXME: xk'ayin // nito'on
@R.Prefijo.1@%<anti%>%<agfoc%>:@R.Prefijo.1@%{≤%}%>ʼo               # ; ! Prefix: +; Suffix: -o
@R.Pass.SinSujeto@%<pass%>:@R.Pass.SinSujeto@%>x         V-TV-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>:j                                                         V-COMMON ; 

LEXICON TV/ej

@D.Pass.SinSujeto@%<v%>%<tv%>:@D.Pass.SinSujeto@%>ej            # ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:e                                                              TV/Vj ; 

LEXICON TV/ij

@D.Pass.SinSujeto@%<v%>%<tv%>:@D.Pass.SinSujeto@%>ij            # ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:i                                                              TV/Vj ; 

LEXICON TV/uj

@D.Pass.SinSujeto@%<v%>%<tv%>:@D.Pass.SinSujeto@%>uj            # ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:u                                                   TV/Vj ; 

LEXICON TV/aj

@D.Pass.SinSujeto@%<v%>%<tv%>:@D.Pass.SinSujeto@%>aj            # ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:a                                                              TV/Vj ; 

LEXICON TV/oj

@D.Pass.SinSujeto@%<v%>%<tv%>:@D.Pass.SinSujeto@%>oj            # ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:o                                                              TV/Vj ; 

LEXICON IV 

%<v%>%<iv%>: # ; 
@D.Prefijo@%<v%>%<iv%>%<pp%>:@D.Prefijo@%{≤%}%>%{i%}näq # ;
@D.Prefijo@%<v%>%<iv%>%<pp%>:@D.Prefijo@%{≤%}%>näq # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON A 

%<adj%>: # ; 

LEXICON A-PL

%<adj%>%<pl%>: # ; 


LEXICON ADV

%<adv%>: # ; 

LEXICON NUM1234

@D.Prefijo@%<num%>:@D.Prefijo@ # ; 
@R.Poss.Sg3@%<num%>%<ord%>:@R.Poss.Sg3@ # ; 

LEXICON NUM-ORD

%<num%>%<ord%>: # ; 

LEXICON NUM-DIST

%<num%>%<dist%>: # ; 

LEXICON NUM5

@D.Prefijo@%<num%>:@D.Prefijo@ # ; 
@R.Poss.Sg3@%<num%>%<ord%>:@R.Poss.Sg3@ # ; 
@D.Prefijo@%<num%>%<dist%>:@D.Prefijo@%>täq # ; 

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Misceláneas

man%<neg%>:man # ; 

ajin%<vaux%>:ajin # ; 
ajin%<vaux%>:tajin # ; 

ta%<mod%>:ta # ;
na%<mod%>:na # ; ! ""
kʼa%<mod%>:kʼa # ; ! ""
yan%<mod%>:yan # ; ! ""
chïk%<mod%>:chïk # ; ! ""
chïk%<mod%>:chik # ; ! "" ! Use/Sub
wi%<foc%>:wi # ; ! ""

apo%<aux%>:apo # ; ! ""

taq%<cnjsub%>:taq # ; ! ""
taj%<cnjsub%>:taj # ; ! ""  = taq?
kʼari%<cnjsub%>:kʼari # ; ! "entonces"
chi%<cnjsub%>:chi # ; ! "" ! Complementiser
we%<cnjsub%>:we # ;
we%<cnjsub%>:wi # ; ! Use/Sub 
we%<cnjsub%>:wä # ; ! Use/Sub ! Src/kwo
y%<cnjcoo%>:y # ; ! "" ! Use/Sub ! Use/Loan ! Src/npass
chuqaʼ%<cnjcoo%>:chuqaʼ # ; 
chuqaʼ%<cnjcoo%>:chuqa # ;  ! Use/Sub
töq%<cnjsub%>:töq # ; ! "cuando"
töq%<cnjsub%>:toq # ; ! "cuando" ! Use/Sub

kʼin%<cnjcoo%>:kʼin # ; ! "y" ! FIXME: check

achiʼel%<cnjsub%>:achiʼel # ; ! "como" ! FIXME: Check

! kʼo = hay

ti%<dim%>:ti # ; 

el%<adv%>%<dir%>:el # ; ! ""
ok%<adv%>%<dir%>:ok # ; ! ""
pe%<adv%>%<dir%>:pe # ; ! ""
apon%<adv%>%<dir%>:apon # ; ! ""
aqʼanij%<adv%>%<dir%>:aqʼanij # ; ! ""
qaj%<adv%>%<dir%>:qaj # ; ! ""
kan%<adv%>%<dir%>:kan # ; ! ""

cha%<quot%>:cha # ; ! ""

ja%<foc%>:ja # ; ! ""

matyox%<ij%>:matyox # ; ! "gracías"
ni%<ij%>:ni # ; ! "no"

!%<perf%>%<o_sg3%>%<s_sg3%>:xu # ;  ! Use/Sub

LEXICON Contracciones

chi%<pr%>%+ech%<n%>%<rel%>%<px3sg%>:chire # ;  ! Use/Sub ! TODO: Check this
chi%<pr%>%+ech%<n%>%<rel%>%<px3sg%>:chre # ;  ! Use/Sub ! TODO: Check this
chi%<pr%>%+ech%<n%>%<rel%>%<px3sg%>:chiraʼ # ;  ! Use/Sub ! TODO: Check this

chi%<pr%>%+ech%<n%>%<rel%>%<px1sg%>:chwe # ;  ! Use/Sub ! Src/npass ! TODO: Check this
chi%<pr%>%+ech%<n%>%<rel%>%<px1sg%>:chweʼ # ;  ! Use/Sub ! Src/kwo ! TODO: Check this

chi%<pr%>%+ech%<n%>%<rel%>%<px2sg%>:chawe # ;  ! Use/Sub ! Src/wiki

chi%<pr%>%+pam%<n%>%<rel%>%<px3sg%>:chupam # ; ! Use/Sub ! TODO: Check this
chi%<pr%>%+wäch%<n%>%<rel%>%<px3sg%>:chuwäch # ; ! Use/Sub ! TODO: Check this
chi%<pr%>%+wäch%<n%>%<rel%>%<px3sg%>:chuwach # ; ! Use/Sub ! Src/story ! TODO: Check this
chi%<pr%>%+wäch%<n%>%<rel%>%<px3sg%>:chwäch # ; ! Use/Sub ! TODO: Check this
chi%<pr%>%+wäch%<n%>%<rel%>%<px3pl%>:chikiwäch # ; ! Use/Sub ! TODO: Check this

LEXICON Preposiciones 

pa%<pr%>:pa # ; 
pa%<pr%>:pan # ; 
chi%<pr%>:chi # ; 

LEXICON Determinantes

ri%<det%>:ri # ;
riʼ%<det%>:riʼ # ;

re%<det%>%<dem%>:re # ;
reʼ%<det%>%<dem%>:reʼ # ;

la%<det%>%<dem%>:la # ;
laʼ%<det%>%<dem%>:laʼ # ;

tat%<det%>%<m%>:tat # ; 
ma%<det%>%<m%>:ma # ; 
a%<det%>%<m%>:a # ; 
xta%<det%>%<f%>:xta # ; 
ixta%<det%>%<f%>:ixta # ; 
nan%<det%>%<f%>:nan # ; 
te%<det%>%<f%>:te # ; 

LEXICON Pronombres

! Juego absolutivo
in%<prn%>%<pers%>:in # ; 
at%<prn%>%<pers%>:at # ; 
!
öj%<prn%>%<pers%>:öj # ; 
ix%<prn%>%<pers%>:ix # ; 
e%<prn%>%<pers%>:e # ; 

ri%<det%>%+in%<prn%>%<pers%>:rïn # ;
ri%<det%>%+in%<prn%>%<pers%>:rin # ; ! Use/Sub ! Src/kwo
ri%<det%>%+at%<prn%>%<pers%>:rat # ;
ri%<det%>%+ijaʼ%<prn%>%<pers%>:rijaʼ # ; ! FIXME: check
ri%<det%>%+öj%<prn%>%<pers%>:röj # ;
ri%<det%>%+öj%<prn%>%<pers%>:roj # ; ! Use/Sub ! Src/npass
ri%<det%>%+ix%<prn%>%<pers%>:rïx # ;
ri%<det%>%+e%<prn%>%<pers%>:rijeʼ # ;
ri%<det%>%+e%<prn%>%<pers%>:rije # ; ! Use/Sub ! Src/npass

ririʼ%<prn%>%<dem%>:ririʼ # ;
rijaʼ%<prn%>%<pers%>:rijaʼ # ;

achike%<prn%>%<itg%>:achike # ; 
!achike%<prn%>%<itg%>:a% chike # ;  ! Use/Sub ! Src/gdik

LEXICON Adjetivos
kʼo:kʼo A ; ! ""  ! TODO: This is like `var' in Turkish
kʼo:kʼoj A ; ! ""  ! TODO: This is like `var' in Turkish
manaq:manaq A ; ! "" ! TODO: Like Turkish `yok'
manaq:manäq A ; ! "" ! TODO: Like Turkish `yok' ! Use/Sub ! FIXME: check 
kʼïy:kʼïy A ; ! "mucho" 
kʼïy:kʼiy A ; ! "mucho"  ! Use/Sub ! Src/wiki
chinojel:chinojel A ; ! "entero, todo" ! FIXME: check
majun:majun A ; ! "ningun"
majun:manjun A ; ! "ningun" ! Use/Sub
español:español A ; ! "" ! Use/Barb ! Use/Sub
mayaʼ:mayaʼ A ; ! "" ! FIXME: check
nïm:nïm A ; ! "grande"
nïm:nim A ; ! "grande" ! Use/Sub ! Src/wiki
nïm:nimaʼq A-PL ; ! "grandes"
tikirel:tikirel A ; ! "eficiente"
jalajöj:jalajöj A ; ! "variado, diverso"
jalajöj:jalajoj A ; ! "variado, diverso" ! Use/Sub ! Src/wiki
jukumaj:jukumaj A ; ! "temprano" 
itzel:itzel A ; ! "malo, feo"
kʼatän:kʼatän A ; ! "caliente"
qʼequʼm:qʼequʼm A ; ! "oscuro"
sipan:sipan A ; ! "gratuita"
samajelaʼ:samajelaʼ A ; ! ""
kʼayew:kʼayew A ; ! ""
tew:tew A ; ! "frío"
kikotem:kikotem A ; ! "contento"
tzʼaqät:tzʼaqät A ; ! "completo"
ütz:ütz A ; ! "bueno, good"
ütz:utz A ; ! "bueno, good" ! Use/Sub ! Src/story
al:al A ; ! "pesado (que pesa), heavy"
chäq’:chäq’ A ; ! "maduro, ripe"
k’ak’a’:k’ak’a’ A ; ! "nuevo, new"
käq:käq A ; ! "rojo, red"
k’atän:k’atän A ; ! "caliente, hot"
ki’:ki’ A ; ! "ser delicioso, be tasty"
k’ïy:k’ïy A ; ! "muchos, many"
ko’öl:ko’öl A ; ! "pequeño, small"
nïm:nïm A ; ! "grande, big"
nojnäq:nojnäq A ; ! "lleno, full"
q’än:q’än A ; ! "amarillo, yellow"
q’eq:q’eq A ; ! "negro, black"
räx:räx A ; ! "verde, green"
ri’j:ri’j A ; ! "viejo, old"
säq:säq A ; ! "blanco, white"
setesïk:setesïk A ; ! "redondo / circular, round"
kʼatzinel:kʼatzinel A ; ! "importante"
loqʼoläj:loqʼoläj A ; ! "santo"
jebʼel:jebʼel A ; ! "bonito, lindo" 
jebʼel:jebʼël A ; ! "bonito, lindo" ! Use/Sub 
nimaläj:nimaläj A ; ! "ilustre"
nimaläj:nimalaj A ; ! "ilustre" ! Use/Sub ! Src/story
kʼakʼaʼ:kʼakʼaʼ A ; ! "nuevo"
kʼakʼaʼ:kʼakʼa A ; ! "nuevo" ! Use/Sub ! Src/wiki
choj:choj A ; ! "simple"
chöj:chöj A ; ! "recto"
qäs:qäs A ; ! "sabroso"
qäs:qas A ; ! "sabroso" ! Use/Sub ! Src/story
LEXICON Tran
ajoʼ:ajoʼ TV ; ! "querer"
tzʼu:tzʼu TV ; ! "see, look at"
tzʼët:tzʼët TV ; ! "mirar, look at"
tzʼët:tzʼät TV ; ! "mirar, look at" ! Use/Sub ! Src/gdik
tzʼët:tzʼat TV ; ! "mirar, look at" ! Use/Sub ! Src/story
bʼän:bʼän TV ; ! "hacer, do"
naʼ:naʼ TV ; ! "sentir"
löqʼ:löqʼ TV ; ! "comprar"
löqʼ:loqʼ TV ; ! "comprar" ! Use/Sub ! Src/kwo
tïk:tïk TV ; ! "sembrar"
chäp:chäp TV ; ! "agarrar"
chöy:chöy TV ; ! "cortar"
toʼ:toʼ TV ; ! "ayudar"
ïl:ïl TV ; ! "encontrar"
qʼät:qʼät TV ; ! "prohibir"
tun:tun TV ; ! "juntar"
xïm:xïm TV ; ! "amarrar"
kʼwaj:kʼwaj TV ; ! "llevar"
qʼetej:qʼet TV/ej ; ! "abrazar"
tzʼibʼabʼej:tzʼibʼabʼ TV/ej ; ! ""
kamisaj:kamis TV/aj ; ! "matar"
kʼaxaj:kʼax TV/aj ; ! "escuchar"
palibʼej:palibʼ TV/ej ; ! ""
oqotaj:oqot TV/aj ; ! "perseguir"
retz:retz TV ; ! "romper"
tzäq:tzäq TV ; ! "botar"
tik:tik TV ; ! "sembrar"
yuq:yuq TV ; ! "amarrar"
pil:pil TV ; ! "raspar"
ajoʼ:ajoʼ TV ; ! "querer"
chʼäy:chʼäy TV ; ! "pegar"
kʼayij:kʼay TV/ij ; ! "vender"
paxij:pax TV/ij ; ! "romper"
kʼutuj:kʼut TV/uj ; ! "preguntar"
matyoxij:matyox TV/ij ; ! "dar las gracías"
awaʼrisaj:awaʼris TV/aj ; ! ""
näq:näq TV ; ! "molestar"
tij:tij TV ; ! "comer"
bʼij:bʼij TV ; ! "decir"
bʼij:bʼïj TV ; ! "decir" ! Use/Sub ! Src/story
bʼaʼ:bʼaʼ TV ; ! "morder"
bʼaʼ:bʼa TV ; ! "morder" ! Use/Sub ! Src/kwo
bʼaʼ:bʼ TV/aj ; ! "morder" ! FIXME: check
qot:qot TV ; ! ""
juchʼ:juchʼ TV ; ! ""
tzʼibʼaj:tzʼibʼ TV/aj ; ! "escribir"
tijoj:tij TV/oj ; ! "enseñar"
siloj:sil TV/oj ; ! "mover"
kanoj:kan TV/oj ; ! "buscar"
chaʼ:chaʼ TV ; ! "elegir, escoger"
kʼëx:kʼëx TV ; ! "cambiar, intercambiar"
kʼëq:kʼëq TV ; ! "botar"
sipaj:sip TV/aj ; ! "regalar"
sök:sök TV ; ! "cortar"
yaʼ:yaʼ TV ; ! "dar, poner"
kʼamoj:kʼam TV/oj  ; ! "adecuar"
kiraj:kir TV/aj  ; ! "extender"
kiroj:kir TV/oj  ; ! "desatar"
kʼisoj:kʼis TV/oj  ; ! "acabar"
kʼojoj:kʼoj TV/oj  ; ! "remendar"
rochoj:roch TV/oj ; ! "arañar"
majoj:maj TV/oj  ; ! "quitar"
muquj:muq TV/uj  ; ! "enterrar"
naʼojij:naʼoj TV/ij  ; ! "pensarlo"
pajoj:paj TV/oj  ; ! "pesar"
tʼuj:tʼ TV/uj  ; ! "palpitar"
weqoj:weq TV/oj  ; ! "adornar, aderezar"
xiloj:xil TV/oj  ; ! "desmenuzar"
taqoj:täq TV/oj ; ! "mandar, decretar"
xoloj:xol TV/oj  ; ! "mezclar"
purij:pur TV/ij ; ! "morder"
kʼwaj:kʼw TV/aj ; ! "llevar"
qas:qas TV ; ! "aplacar"
